Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Article 1. Provisions Applicable to Counties, Cities and Towns.

§ 27-6.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-6.01.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Fire company”
means a volunteer firefighting organization organized pursuant to §

27-8

in any county, city, or town of the Commonwealth for the purpose of fighting fires.

“Fire department”
means a firefighting organization established as a department of government of any county, city, or town pursuant to §

27-6.1

.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to immunity for volunteer first responders en route to an emergency, see §

8.01-225.3

.

As to firefighter mental health awareness training, see §

9.1-203.1

.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 35 Limitation of Actions: Statute of Limitations; Immunities; Res Judicata and Collateral Estoppel. § 35.02 Immunities. Friend.

§ 27-6.02.
Provision of firefighting services.

Any county, city, or town may provide firefighting services to its citizens by (i) establishing a fire department as a department of government pursuant to §

27-6.1

or (ii) contracting with or providing for the provision of firefighting services by a fire company established pursuant to §

27-8

.

In cases in which a county, city, or town elects to contract with or provide for the provision of firefighting services by a fire company pursuant to clause (ii) of subsection A, the fire company shall be deemed to be an instrumentality of the county, city, or town and, as such, exempt from suit for damages done incident to fighting fires therein. The county, city, or town may elect to provide for the matters authorized in §§

27-4

and

27-39

.As used in this section, “provide firefighting services” includes travel while performing fire, rescue, or other emergency operations in emergency vehicles or fire apparatus as described in §§

46.2-920

and

46.2-1023

, respectively.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Sovereign immunity. —

Paramedic was not entitled to sovereign immunity because, in returning to an area where she would be in a position to prepare to provide emergency medical services, she was not providing or performing emergency medical services and she was not exercising some degree of discretion beyond that required for ordinary driving situations at the moment of an accident with a hospital employee. Bosserman v. Hayes, 89 Va. Cir. 84, 2014 Va. Cir. LEXIS 144 (Augusta County May 29, 2014).

§ 27-6.1.
Establishment of fire department; chief, officers, and employees.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may establish a fire department as a department of government and may designate it by any name consistent with the names of its other governmental units. The head of such fire department shall be known as “the chief.” As many other officers and employees may be employed in such fire department as the governing body may approve.

History.

1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2008, c. 410; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1970, c. 187, which added or amended many of the sections in this article, provides, in cl. 3, that the act shall be liberally construed and is severable.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in two places.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “or ‘the director’ ” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and, in the first sentence, substituted “any county, city, or town” for “any city, town or county,” and substituted “may establish a fire department as a department of government and” for “may establish as a department of government a fire/EMS department and”’; deleted “or the director” following “the chief” in the second sentence; and substituted “fire department” for “fire/EMS department” in the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

County may require reimbursement of costs for emergency services. —

As the provision of emergency services by a county is discretionary, requiring reimbursement from a user of such services for the reasonable costs associated with the use of emergency equipment owned and maintained by the county is appropriate. See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Deanis L. Simmons, County Attorney for Tazewell County, 00-068 (11/29/00).

§ 27-6.2.
Applicant preemployment information with fire departments.

Applicants for employment with the fire department of any locality having a local ordinance adopted in accordance with §

19.2-389

may be required to submit to fingerprinting and to provide personal descriptive information to be forwarded along with the applicant’s fingerprints through the Central Criminal Records Exchange and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information regarding such applicant; however, such applicants shall, if required by local ordinance, pay the cost of the fingerprinting or criminal records check or both.

The Central Criminal Records Exchange, upon receipt of an applicant’s record or notification that no record exists, shall make a report to the fire chief or his designee, who must belong to a governmental entity. In determining whether a criminal conviction directly relates to a position, the locality shall consider the following criteria: (i) the nature and seriousness of the crime; (ii) the relationship of the crime to the work to be performed in the position applied for; (iii) the extent to which the position applied for might offer an opportunity to engage in further criminal activity of the same type as that in which the person had been involved; (iv) the relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity or fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the position being sought; (v) the extent and nature of the person’s past criminal activity; (vi) the age of the person at the time of the commission of the crime; (vii) the amount of time that has elapsed since the person’s last involvement in the commission of a crime; (viii) the conduct and work activity of the person prior to and following the criminal activity; and (ix) evidence of the person’s rehabilitation or rehabilitative effort while incarcerated or following release.

If an applicant is denied employment because of information appearing in his criminal history record, the locality shall provide a copy of the information obtained from the Central Criminal Records Exchange to the applicant. The information shall not be disseminated except as provided for in this section.

History.

2001, cc. 353, 373; 2003, c. 739; 2018, c. 834.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 739, in the second paragraph, added “who must belong to a governmental entity” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 834, in the first paragraph, substituted “the fire department of any locality” for “the Arlington County Fire Department” and “may be required” for “shall be required” in the first sentence.

§ 27-7.
Bylaws of fire department; compensation of officers and employees; information on check stubs, time cards, etc.

The governing body of any county, city, or town may empower the fire department therein to make bylaws to promote its objects consistent with the laws of the Commonwealth and ordinances of the county, city, or town and may provide for the compensation of the officers and employees of such department.

All check stubs or time cards purporting to be a record of time spent on the job by a firefighter shall record all hours of employment, regardless of how spent. All check stubs or pay records purporting to show the hourly compensation of a firefighter shall show the actual hourly wage to be paid. Nothing in this section shall require the showing of such information on check stubs, time cards, or pay records; however, if such information is shown, the information shall be in compliance with this section.

History.

Code 1919, § 3126; 1970, c. 187; 1984, c. 595; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in the first paragraph, and inserted “or emergency medical services personnel” in the second paragraph, in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and, in the first paragraph, substituted “any county, city, or town may empower the fire department” for “any city, town or county may empower the fire/EMS department,” substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth,” and substituted “ordinances of the county, city, or town” for “ordinances of the city, town or county”; and in the second paragraph, substituted “firefighter” for “fire-fighter or emergency medical services personnel” twice, and “information is shown” for “information shall be shown.”

§ 27-8.
Who may form a fire company; limit on number of persons in combined companies.

Any number of persons, not less than 20, may form themselves into a company for extinguishing fires. In any county in which two or more companies for extinguishing fires join together and singly use one fire station, the number of persons in the combined companies shall be not less than 20.

History.

Code 1919, § 3121; 1946, p. 110; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 inserted “or for performing emergency medical services, or both” in the first sentence, inserted “or for performing emergency medical services” and substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in the second sentence, and added the last sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “20” for “twenty” both times it appears in the section; deleted “or for performing emergency medical services, or both” from the end of the first sentence; in the second sentence, deleted “or for performing emergency medical services shall” preceding “join,” and substituted “fire station” for “fire/EMS station”; deleted the third sentence which read: “The minimum number of persons required by this section shall only apply to the formation of a fire company.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Section not applicable. —

County did not have the express statutory authority or the authority by implication to issue billings for a corporation’s emergency medical services or to collect the proceeds from such billings because §

27-8

was not applicable to the corporation when the earliest definition of an Emergency Medical Services company existed in 1970, and the corporate charter for the corporation was issued in 1952; even if the corporation met the definition of an EMS company under §

27-8.1

, the rules of statutory construction required that §

32.1-111.14

controlled because it addressed the powers of governing bodies over emergency services agencies in a specific manner. County of Campbell v. Altavista Lifesaving & First Aid Crew, Inc., 75 Va. Cir. 491, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 304 (Campbell County Oct. 11, 2007).

§ 27-8.1.
Repealed by Acts 2015, cc. 502 and 503, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

27-8.1

pertaining to definitions of “emergency medical services personnel,” “emergency medical services vehicle,” and “fire/EMS company,” derived from 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142.

§ 27-9.
Organization of fire company.

A writing stating the formation of a fire company, with the names of the members thereof thereto subscribed, shall be recorded in the court of the city or the court of the county wherein such fire company is located, after which the members of the fire company may make regulations for effecting its objects consistent with the laws of the Commonwealth, the ordinances of the county, city, or town and the bylaws of the fire department thereof. The principal officer of such fire company shall be known as “the chief.”

History.

Code 1919, § 3122; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to organization of fire company being prerequisite to appointment of officers, see §

27-13

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” near the end of the second sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “formation of a fire company” for “formation of such company,” combined the former first and second sentences into a single sentence by substituting “wherein such fire company is located, after which the members of the fire company” for “wherein such fire company is. After which, the members of the company,” and substituted “county, city, or town and the bylaws of the fire department” for “city, town or county and the bylaws of the fire/EMS department.”

§ 27-10.
Dissolution of fire company.

Whenever the fire department of the county, city, or town to which any fire company belongs ascertains that such company has failed, for three months successively, to consist of 20 effective members, or ascertains that it has failed for the like period to have or keep in good and serviceable condition an engine, hose, and equipment and other proper implements, or the governing body of the county, city, or town for any reason deems it advisable, such governing body may dissolve the fire company.

History.

Code 1919, § 3136; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in two places, inserted “in the case of a fire company,” and inserted “emergency medical services vehicle and equipment.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire department” for “fire/EMS department,” “county, city, or town” for “city, town or county,” “fire company” for “fire/EMS company” the first time it appears, and substituted “20 effective members or ascertains” for “twenty effective members in the case of a fire company, or ascertain”; deleted “emergency medical services vehicle” preceding “and equipment” and inserted “fire” following “may dissolve the.”

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 27 Property Actions. Friend.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Authority to dissolve. —

Fire Services Agreement entered into between the county and volunteer fire company could not be used to prevent the county from dissolving the volunteer fire company for the volunteer fire company’s conduct in requesting that the county approve the purchase of a piece of fire-fighting equipment despite the volunteer fire company not using the proper procedure that would have allowed the county to first issue a recommendation regarding the purchase; while the county’s alleged threat to revoke the volunteer fire company’s funding and in effect dissolve it would not have been unlawful because the county had the authority to dissolve pursuant to §

27-10

, the county did not dissolve the volunteer fire company, but, instead restructured the volunteer fire company’s operations. Am. Fire Equip., Inc. v. Widewater Volunteer Fire & Rescue Servs., 74 Va. Cir. 101, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 138 (Stafford County Aug. 9, 2007).

§ 27-11.
Duty of members on alarm of fire or call of a medical emergency.

Every member of the fire company shall, upon any alarm of fire or call of a medical emergency, attend according to the ordinances of the county, city, or town, or the bylaws, rules, or regulations of the fire department or the fire company’s regulations, and endeavor to extinguish such fire or assist in the medical emergency.

History.

Code 1919, § 3123; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 inserted “or call of a medical emergency,” substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire,” and inserted “or assist in the medical emergency.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and inserted “fire” preceding “company”; substituted “fire”’ for “fire/EMS”’; inserted “fire”’ preceding “company’s”’; and made stylistic changes.

§ 27-12.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-13.
Appointment of chief and other officers.

In every county, city, or town in which a fire company is established, there shall be appointed, at such time and in such manner as the governing body of such county, city, or town may prescribe, a chief and as many other officers as such governing body may direct.

History.

Code 1919, § 3125; 1970, c. 187; 2008, c. 410; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “or director.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “a fire company is established” for “there is any such company”; deleted “or director” following “chief”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 27-14.
Ordinances as to fire departments and fire companies.

The governing body of any county, city, or town in which a fire department or fire company is established may make such ordinances in relation to the powers and duties of such fire departments or fire companies, and chiefs and other officers of such fire departments or fire companies, as it may deem proper, including billing property owners on behalf of volunteer fire departments as provided in §

38.2-2130

.

The ordinances shall not require a minor who achieved certification under National Fire Protection Association 1001, level one, firefighter standards, as administered by the Department of Fire Programs, on or before January 1, 2006, between the ages of 15 and 16, to repeat the certification after his sixteenth birthday.

History.

Code 1919, § 3127; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2006, c. 462; 2008, c. 410; 2013, cc. 356, 616; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire.’

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 462 inserted the subsection A designation and added subsection B.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “or directors” in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 356 and 616 are identical, and added “including billing property owners on behalf of volunteer fire departments as provided in §

38.2-2130

” at the end of subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and in subsection A, substituted “The governing body of any county, city, or town in which a fire department or fire company is established” for “Such governing body” and “such fire departments or fire companies, and chiefs and other officers of such fire departments or fire companies” for “fire/EMS departments, companies, chiefs or directors and other officers.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

County has authority to adopt code regarding emergency medical services permits. —

Article III, Chapter 10 of the Campbell County, Va., Code complied with subdivision A 2 of §

32.1-111.14

because the statute granted permits to various fire and rescue organizations in the county in order to allow them to furnish emergency medical services in accordance with §

32.1-111.14

; the other provisions of Article III were well within the authority of the county to enact ordinances and regulations regulating Emergency Medical Service companies and departments granted by subdivision A 8 of §

32.1-111.14

and §

27-14

. County of Campbell v. Altavista Lifesaving & First Aid Crew, Inc., 75 Va. Cir. 491, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 304 (Campbell County Oct. 11, 2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Billing for emergency services. —

This section does not permit a locality to adopt an ordinance authorizing a volunteer fire department to assess and charge a fee to an individual’s homeowners’ or automobile insurance policy for responding to a fire emergency. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clarence E. “Bud” Phillips, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 11-082, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (7/22/11).

§ 27-15.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-15.1.
Authority of chief or other officer in charge when answering alarm; penalty for refusal to obey orders.

While any fire department or fire company is in the process of answering an alarm where there is imminent danger or the actual occurrence of fire or explosion or the uncontrolled release of hazardous materials that threaten life or property and returning to the station, the chief or other officer in charge of such fire department or fire company at that time shall have the authority to (i) maintain order at such emergency incident or its vicinity, including the immediate airspace; (ii) direct the actions of the firefighters at the incident; (iii) notwithstanding the provisions of §§

46.2-888

through

46.2-891

, keep bystanders or other persons at a safe distance from the incident and emergency equipment; (iv) facilitate the speedy movement and operation of emergency equipment and firefighters; (v) cause an investigation to be made into the origin and cause of the incident; and (vi) until the arrival of a police officer, direct and control traffic in person or by deputy and facilitate the movement of traffic. The fire chief or other officer in charge shall display his firefighter’s badge or other proper means of identification. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this authority shall extend to the activation of traffic control signals designed to facilitate the safe egress and ingress of emergency equipment at a fire station. Any person or persons refusing to obey the orders of the chief or other officer in charge at that time is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor. The chief or other officer in charge shall have the power to make arrests for violation of the provisions of this section. The authority granted under the provisions of this section may not be exercised to inhibit or obstruct members of law-enforcement agencies or emergency medical services agencies from performing their normal duties when operating at such emergency incident, nor to conflict with or diminish the lawful authority, duties, and responsibilities of forest wardens, including but not limited to the provisions of Chapter 11 (§ 10.1-1100 et seq.) of Title 10.1. Personnel from the news media, such as the press, radio, and television, when gathering the news may enter at their own risk into the incident area only when the officer in charge has deemed the area safe and only into those areas of the incident that do not, in the opinion of the officer in charge, interfere with the fire department or fire company, firefighters, or emergency medical services personnel dealing with such emergencies, in which case the chief or other officer in charge may order such person from the scene of the emergency incident.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1977, c. 326; 1984, c. 644; 2001, c. 142; 2008, c. 410; 2015, cc. 502, 503; 2017, c. 517.

Cross references.

As to power of a fire chief to take property found at the scene of a fire or explosion, see §

27-34.1

.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire,” throughout, inserted “or emergency medical services personnel” in clause (ii) and clause (iv), inserted “or emergency medical services personnel’s” in the second sentence, deleted “fire” preceding “chief or his deputies” in the fourth sentence, and substituted “fire fighters or emergency medical services personnel” for “rescue workers” in the last sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “director” following “chief” four times throughout the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and throughout the section, deleted “director” following “chief,” substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS” and “firefighters” for “fire fighters or emergency medical services personnel” or variants; deleted “or operating at an emergency incident” following “answering an alarm”; inserted “fire” preceding “company”; deleted “director, or his deputies” following “chief” in the fourth sentence; substituted “is” for “shall be” preceding “guilty” and “emergency medical services agencies” for “rescue squads”; inserted “(§ 10.1-1100 et seq.)” following “Chapter 11”; substituted “fire company, firefighters” for “fire-fighters” in the last sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 517 inserted “including the immediate airspace” in clause (i) of the section.

§ 27-15.1:1.
Penalty for refusing or neglecting to obey order of chief or other officer in command.

If any person at a fire refuses or neglects to obey any order duly given by the chief or other officer in command, he shall be fined a civil penalty not to exceed $100.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 27-15.2.
Purchase, maintenance, etc., of equipment; donated equipment.

The governing body of every county, city, and town shall have power to provide for the purchase, operation, staffing, and maintenance of suitable equipment for firefighting or performing emergency medical services in or upon the property of the county, city, or town and of its inhabitants, and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the same will be used for fighting fires or performing emergency medical services in or upon privately owned property. All equipment purchased after October 1, 1970, shall be equipped with threads of USA Standard B2.3, B2.4 of the American Standards Association.

Any fire department of a county, city, or town, or any fire company donating equipment for fighting fires to any fire department or any fire company, which equipment met existing engineering and safety standards at the time of its purchase by the donating entity, shall be immune from civil liability unless the donating entity acted with gross negligence or willful misconduct.

A safety inspection shall be completed by a certified emergency vehicle service center and a report designating any deficiencies shall be provided prior to the change in ownership of the donated emergency vehicle.

History.

1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2010, c. 545; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 inserted “or performing emergency medical services” in two places.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 545 inserted the subsection A designation, and added subsections B and C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and in subsection A, substituted “staffing” for “manning” following “operation” and “firefighting” for “fighting fires” following “equipment for”; in subsection B, substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS” throughout the subsection and deleted “or performing emergency medical services” following “fires”; substituted “shall” for “must” in subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 8A-1302 Consumer Lease/Option to Purchase under Uniform Commercial Code (Public Entity).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Statutory authority not restricted. —

County did not breach the Fire Services Agreement that it entered into with the volunteer fire company when it declined to approve the volunteer fire company’s request to approve the purchase of a piece of fire-fighting equipment, despite the volunteer fire company’s claim that the agreement was violated because the agreement provided that the county would not interfere with the volunteer fire company’s operational control; the county’s authority to purchase fire-fighting equipment, pursuant to §

27-15.2

, could not be restricted by the Fire Services Agreement. Am. Fire Equip., Inc. v. Widewater Volunteer Fire & Rescue Servs., 74 Va. Cir. 101, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 138 (Stafford County Aug. 9, 2007).

§ 27-15.3.
Purchase of service-issued boots or helmet by certain firefighters.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing body of any county, city, or town may allow any paid or volunteer firefighter for such jurisdiction with 10 or more years of service, but fewer than 20, to purchase the helmet or boots issued to the firefighter at fair market value.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the governing body of any county, city, or town may allow any paid or volunteer firefighter for such jurisdiction with over 20 years of service to be given the helmet or boots issued to the firefighters or to purchase the helmet or boots issued to the firefighter at a price of $1.

History.

2011, c. 22.

§ 27-16.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-17.
Entry of buildings on fire and premises adjoining.

The chief of any fire department or fire company or other authorized officer in command at a fire or medical emergency, and his subordinates, upon his order or direction, shall have the right at any time of the day or night to enter any building or upon any premises where a fire is in progress, or any building or premises adjacent thereto for the purpose of extinguishing the fire.

History.

Code 1919, § 3130; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire,” inserted “or medical emergency” in two places, and substituted “fire or performing emergency medical services” for “same.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS” preceding “department”; inserted “fire” preceding “company”; and deleted “or medical emergency” preceding “is in progress” and “or performing emergency medical services” at the end of the section.

§ 27-17.1.
Remaining on premises after fire extinguished.

The chief or other authorized officer of any fire department or fire company in command at a fire, and his subordinates upon his order or direction, shall have the right to remain at the scene of fire, including remaining in any building or house, for purposes of protecting the property and preventing the public from entry into the premises, until such reasonable time as the owner may resume responsibility for the protection of the property.

History.

1978, c. 149; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in two places, inserted “or medical emergency” in two places, and deleted “damaged” preceding “premises.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS” throughout the section and deleted “or medical emergency” following “command at a fire” and following “at the scene of fire.”

§ 27-18.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-19.
Repealed by Acts 2015, cc. 502 and 503, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

27-19

, pertaining to the penalty for disobeying the chief or other officer in command, derived from Code 1919, § 3132; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142.

§ 27-20.
Destruction of property to prevent spread of fire.

The chief, or other officer commanding in his absence, may direct the pulling down or destroying of any fence, house, or other thing which he may judge necessary to be pulled down or destroyed to prevent the further spreading of a fire, and for this purpose may require such assistance from all present as he shall judge necessary.

History.

Code 1919, § 3133; 1970, c. 187; 2001, c. 142; 2008, c. 410; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “a fire” for “the fire.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 410 inserted “director” near the beginning of the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and deleted “director” following “chief.”

§ 27-21.
Owner may recover amount of actual damage.

The owner of property destroyed pursuant to §

27-20

shall be entitled to recover from the county, city, or town the amount of the actual damage that he may have sustained by reason of the same having been pulled down or destroyed under such direction.

History.

Code 1919, § 3134; 1970, c. 187; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “property destroyed pursuant to §

27-20

” for “such property” and made stylistic changes.

§ 27-22.
But not for property which would have been destroyed by the fire.

Section

27-21

shall not enable anyone to recover compensation for property which would have been destroyed by the fire, if the same had not been pulled down or destroyed under such direction, but only for what could have been saved with ordinary care and diligence, had no such direction been given.

History.

Code 1919, § 3135.

§ 27-23.
Repealed by Acts 1970, c. 187.

§ 27-23.1.
Establishment of fire zones or districts; tax levies.

The governing bodies of the several cities or counties of the Commonwealth may create and establish, by designation on a map of the city or county showing current, official parcel boundaries, or by any other description which is legally sufficient for the conveyance of property or the creation of parcels, fire zones or districts in such cities or counties, within which may be located and established one or more fire departments, to be equipped with apparatus for fighting fires and protecting property and human life within such zones or districts from loss or damage by fire, illness or injury.

In the event of the creation of such zones or districts in any city or county, the city or county governing body may acquire, in the name of the city or county, real or personal property to be devoted to the uses aforesaid, and shall prescribe rules and regulations for the proper management, control, and conduct thereof. Such governing body shall also have authority to contract with, or secure the services of, any individual corporation, organization, or municipal corporation, or any volunteer firefighters for such fire protection as may be required.

To raise funds for the purposes aforesaid, the governing body of any city or county in which such zones or districts are established may levy annually a tax on the assessed value of all property real and personal within such zones or districts, subject to local taxation, which tax shall be extended and collected as other city or county taxes are extended and collected. However, any property located in Augusta County that has qualified for an agricultural or forestal use-value assessment pursuant to Article 4 (§

58.1-3229

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1 may not be included within such a zone or district and may not be subject to such tax. In any city or county having a population between 25,000 and 25,500, the maximum rate of tax under this section shall be $0.30 on $100 of assessed value.

The amount realized from such levy shall be kept separate from all other moneys of the city or county and shall be applied to no other purpose than the maintenance and operation of the fire departments and companies established under the provisions of this section.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1972, c. 252; 1977, c. 326; 1978, c. 682; 1985, c. 343; 1993, c. 915; 2001, cc. 111, 142; 2007, c. 813; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

Cross references.

As to the latest United States Census figures for counties and cities of the Commonwealth of Virginia, see the Appendix to Title 15.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2001 amendments.

The first 2001 amendment by c. 111, in the third paragraph, added the second sentence, and substituted “$0.30 on $100” for “30¢ on the $100” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” throughout; in the first paragraph, deleted “or rescue” preceding “zones or districts,” deleted “and/or rescue squads” preceding “to be equipped”; in the second paragraph, inserted “or emergency medical services personnel,” substituted “emergency medical services” for “rescue” preceding “protection as may”; and substituted “companies” for “rescue squads” in the last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Augusta County” for “any county with a population between 54,600 and 55,600 according to the 1990 United States Census” in the second sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS” throughout the section and substituted “fire fighters for such fire protection” for “fire fighters or emergency medical services personnel for such fire or emergency medical services” in the second paragraph.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Organizations providing fire or emergency medical services. —

A Virginia locality may provide appropriations to certain organizations providing fire or emergency medical services regardless of their classification as IRS nonprofit entities and regardless of whether they provide compensation to individual members.
See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Dana T. Bundick, Treasurer, County of Accomack, 12-052, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 63 (7/26/13).

§ 27-23.2.
Advances by city or county to fire zone or district.

The governing body of any city or county in the Commonwealth may advance funds, not otherwise specifically allocated or obligated, from the general fund to a fire zone or district to assist the fire zone or district to exercise the powers set forth in §

27-23.1

.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1985, c. 343; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire zone or district” for “fire/EMS district,”’ and inserted “zone” following “assist the fire”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 27-23.3.
Reimbursement for advances.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the governing body shall direct the treasurer to reimburse the general fund of the city or county from the proceeds of any funds to the credit of the fire zone or district not otherwise specifically allocated or obligated to the extent that the city or county has made advances to the fire zone or district from such general fund to assist the zone or district to exercise the powers set forth in §

27-23.1

.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1985, c. 343; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and throughout the section, added “zone or” preceding “district” and substituted “fire” for “fire/EMS.”

§ 27-23.4.
Validation of prior advances.

The advancement of any funds heretofore advanced from the general fund by the governing body of any city or county in this Commonwealth for the benefit of a fire zone or district in exercising the lawful powers of such fire zone or district is hereby validated and confirmed.

History.

1970, c. 187; 1985, c. 343; 2001, c. 142; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 142 substituted “fire/EMS” for “fire” in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “fire zone or district” for “fire/EMS district” throughout the section.